Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.30.040

Career connected learning cross-agency work group—Duties and responsibilities.

The career connected learning cross-agency work group established in RCW 28C.30.030 shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(1) Advance and promote the career connect Washington vision to create a statewide system for career connected learning and the need for joint action as follows:

(a) Create, and periodically update, clear guidance for endorsing career launch programs to guide quality assurance for the purpose of expanding enrollments by August 1, 2019. Registered apprenticeships as approved by the Washington apprenticeship and training council at the department of labor and industries are considered endorsed career launch programs;

(b) Prioritize activities including coordinating cross-agency and industry sector leadership to advance strategic priorities;

(c) Implement a marketing and communications agenda;

(d) Mobilize private sector and philanthropic leadership and resources to support system building;

(e) Build systemic functions in key agencies and existing systems;

(f) Create a statewide inventory that identifies existing support programs to promote equitable participation in career connected learning, including resources for populations to reengage with educational opportunities;

(g) Develop websites and other resources, and coordinate current resources managed by the workforce training and education coordinating board, the student achievement council, and the employment security department, to inform students, employers, and the public about career connected learning opportunities;

(h) Develop financial and other support services to increase access and success in career connected learning for students facing barriers or living in underserved communities;

(i) Address transfer and articulation issues to ensure career launch program participants receive high school and college credit in programs initiated in K-12 or dropout reengagement programs, or college credit in postsecondary programs and registered apprenticeships, and work to expand the portability of credits to the maximum extent possible;

(j) With respect to the portability of credit for the purposes of postsecondary degree attainment, the career connected learning [cross-agency] work group shall coordinate when appropriate with the complete Washington program;

(k) Establish clear targets for equity to guide state data development and action by regional partners related to program design and expansion, including specific equity-focused criteria within grant funding processes and strategies; and

(l) Develop data systems and protocols for career connected learning planning and evaluation purposes;

(2) By September 1, 2019, and by each September 1st thereafter, make budget recommendations to the office of financial management, to direct resources to education programs for career connected learning as follows:

(a) Support the K-12 system and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to increase student participation in career connected learning and work-integrated learning programs that include career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch;

(b) Support expansion of innovative program design in registered apprenticeships, year-round and summer programs, and equitable access to dual credit;

(c) Support two-year and four-year institutions of higher education to expand career connected learning enrollments, and specifically:

(i) Build capacity at community and technical colleges to support innovative design in career launch and registered apprenticeship programs, as well as program participation by high school graduates or out-of-school youth;

(ii) Align the use of work-study to support career launch and registered apprenticeship programs; and

(iii) Clarify financial aid eligibility and exclusions from financial aid caps for career launch and registered apprenticeship programs;

(d) Promote innovation in equivalency and credentialing within endorsed career launch and registered apprenticeship programs;

(e) Expand the number of portable credits and credit for prior learning to ensure that career launch programs transfer for high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible; and

(f) Support the registered apprenticeship system and the department of labor and industries to build capacity to expand registered apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs;

(3) Support regional leadership, program intermediaries, and career connected learning and work-integrated learning navigation and coordination to expand participation in career connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities and the implementation of the career connected learning grant program established in RCW 28C.30.050;

(4) Support the formation and operation of regional networks in both rural and urban areas to guide career connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities that are both tailored to the local needs of students and employers, and designed for portable credentials across education settings and across an industry; and

(5) Develop a data enclave for career connected learning and work-integrated learning to measure progress and ensure equity of opportunity for career connected learning and work-integrated learning, led by the education research and data center at the office of financial management, as follows:

(a) Develop program codes for career connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities in K-12 and postsecondary education in order to track those programs that are designated as career connected learning programs for each of the three categories set forth in the definition of "career connected learning" in RCW 28C.30.020; and

(b) Collect and disaggregate program participation and outcomes data by race, gender, income, rurality, ability, foster youth, homeless youth, English language learner, and other relevant categories.

[ 2019 c 406 s 55.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.